Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,164
Action on a plan of merger or share
exchange.

(MBCA
11.04) In the case of a domestic corporation that is a party to a merger or
share exchange:

(1) The plan of merger or
share exchange must be adopted by the board of directors.

(2) Except as provided in
subdivision (8) of this section and in section 21-2,165, after adopting the
plan of merger or share exchange the board of directors must submit the plan
to the shareholders for their approval. The board of directors must also transmit
to the shareholders a recommendation that the shareholders approve the plan
unless (i) the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts
of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation
or (ii) section 21-2,101 applies. If either subdivision (2)(i) or (ii) of
this section applies, the board must transmit to the shareholders the basis
for so proceeding.

(3)
The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of merger
or share exchange to the shareholders on any basis.

(4) If the plan of merger or share exchange
is required to be approved by the shareholders and if the approval is to be
given at a meeting, the corporation must notify each shareholder, whether
or not entitled to vote, of the meeting of shareholders at which the plan
is to be submitted for approval. The notice must state that the purpose, or
one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan and must contain
or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. If the corporation is
to be merged into an existing corporation or other entity, the notice shall
also include or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the articles of incorporation
or organizational documents of that corporation or other entity. If the corporation
is to be merged into a corporation or other entity that is to be created pursuant
to the merger, the notice shall include or be accompanied by a copy or a summary
of the articles of incorporation or organizational documents of the new corporation
or other entity.

(5)
Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors acting pursuant
to subdivision (3) of this section requires a greater vote or a greater number
of votes to be present, approval of the plan of merger or share exchange requires
the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum consisting
of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the plan exists,
and if any class or series of shares is entitled to vote as a separate group
on the plan of merger or share exchange, the approval of each such separate
voting group at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group consisting
of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the merger or share
exchange by that voting group is present.

(6) Subject to subdivision (7) of this section, separate
voting by voting groups is required:

(i) On a plan of merger, by each class or series of
shares that:

(A)
Are to be converted under the plan of merger into other securities, interests,
obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities, or interests, cash,
other property, or any combination of the foregoing; or

(B) Are entitled to vote
as a separate group on a provision in the plan that constitutes a proposed
amendment to articles of incorporation of a surviving corporation, that requires
action by separate voting groups under section 21-2,153;

(ii) On a plan of share exchange,
by each class or series of shares included in the exchange with each class
or series constituting a separate voting group; and

(iii) On a plan of merger or share exchange,
if the voting group is entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote
as a voting group to approve a plan of merger or share exchange.

(7) The articles of incorporation
may expressly limit or eliminate the separate voting rights provided in subdivisions
(6)(i)(A) and (6)(ii) of this section as to any class or series of shares,
except for a transaction that (i) includes what is or would be, if the corporation
were the surviving corporation, an amendment subject to subdivision (6)(i)(B)
of this section and (ii) will effect no significant change in the assets of
the resulting entity, including all parents and subsidiaries on a consolidated
basis.

(8)
Unless the articles of incorporation otherwise provide, approval by the corporation's
shareholders of a plan of merger or share exchange is not required if:

(i) The corporation will
survive the merger or is the acquiring corporation in a share exchange;

(ii) Except for amendments
permitted by section 21-2,154, its articles of incorporation will not be changed;

(iii) Each shareholder of
the corporation whose shares were outstanding immediately before the effective
date of the merger or share exchange will hold the same number of shares,
with identical preferences, limitations, and relative rights, immediately
after the effective date of change; and

(iv) The issuance in the merger or share exchange
of shares or other securities convertible into or rights exercisable for shares
does not require a vote under subsection (f) of section 21-242.

(9) If as a result of a merger
or share exchange one or more shareholders of a domestic corporation would
become subject to owner liability for the debts, obligations, or liabilities
of any other person or entity, approval of the plan of merger or share exchange
shall require the execution by each such shareholder of a separate written
consent to become subject to such owner liability.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 164.